New Mexico, session 2026, HB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of environment for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 for drinking water needs statewide, including private well testing and water filtration systems. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233234.2